Georgia, session 2025_26, HB348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 14 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to domestic stock
and mutual insurers, is amended in Article 5, relating to limited purpose subsidiary insurance
companies, by revising Code Section 33-14-103, relating to powers of limited purpose
subsidiary, as follows:
"33-14-103.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'sponsor' means any entity that sponsors or
co-sponsors the formation of a limited purpose subsidiary or the issuances of securities by
a limited purpose subsidiary or participates in a limited purpose subsidiary as an investor
or otherwise assists with the raising of equity or debt for a limited purpose subsidiary.
H. B. 348
- 1 -

LC 52 0715/AP
(b) A limited purpose subsidiary that is granted a certificate of authority by the
Commissioner under this article:
(1) Is wholly owned by the organizing domestic reinsurer or one or more sponsors;
(2) Is authorized to engage in the business of reinsurance only for the lines of insurance
for which the organizing domestic reinsurer or a sponsor is authorized; and
(3) May reinsure only risks of the organizing domestic reinsurer; and
(4) May access alternative forms of financing."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 41 of said title, relating to captive insurance companies, is amended in Code Section
33-41-2, relating to definitions, by revising paragraph (6) as follows:
"(6) 'Controlled unaffiliated business' means:
(A) Any person:
(i) That is not in the corporate system of a parent and its affiliated companies;
(ii) That has an existing a reinsurance, risk-sharing, or other contractual relationship
with a parent or one of its affiliated companies or is a direct or indirect investor in a
pure captive insurance company; and
(iii) Whose risks are managed by or directly or indirectly ceded to a captive insurance
company in accordance with this chapter and approved by the Commissioner; or
(B) A reinsurance arrangement with other captive insurance companies that is
approved by the Commissioner."
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 33-41-3, relating to permissible business
and limitations, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section and the other
provisions of this chapter, a captive insurance company, where permitted by its formation
H. B. 348
- 2 -

LC 52 0715/AP
documents, may engage in the business of any of the following kinds of insurance or
reinsurance: that the Commissioner may deem reasonable.
(1) Casualty, as described in Code Section 33-7-3 but excluding accident and sickness
insurance as defined in Code Section 33-7-2, except for a pure captive insurance
company, which may engage in the business of accident and sickness insurance as
defined in Code Section 33-7-2;
(2) Marine and transportation, as described in Code Section 33-7-5;
(3) Property, as described in Code Section 33-7-6; and
(4) Surety, as described in Code Section 33-7-7."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective on the first day of the month following the month in which
it is approved by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 348
- 3 -